Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.030

Public stadium authority—Board of directors—Appointment—Terms—Vacancy—Removal.

(1) A public stadium authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of seven members appointed by the governor. The speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the house of representatives, the majority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of the senate shall each recommend to the governor a person to be appointed to the board.

(2) Members of the board of directors shall serve four-year terms of office, except that three of the initial seven board members shall serve two-year terms of office. The governor shall designate the initial terms of office for the initial members who are appointed.

(3) A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment was made and the person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term of the office for the position to which he or she was appointed.

(4) A director appointed by the governor may be removed from office by the governor.

[ 1997 c 220 s 103 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]